California statutes. Public Resources Code
If any land is assessed on the assessment roll to unknown or fictitiously named owners, or to unnamed owners in addition to any owner or owners named thereon, the land has, for the purposes of this division, but one owner in addition to any owner or owners whose true name or names may be purported to be given on the assessment book.

The holder of title to an undivided interest in any land is an owner as to his interest for the purposes of this division, and such undivided interests shall be counted and valued as though they were separate interests. If the assessment roll fails to indicate the extent of any undivided interest, the holders of title whose undivided interests are not specifically defined are owners for the purposes of this division, of equal shares therein.

The value of any land and the owners of any land are conclusively determined, for the purposes of this division, by the last equalized assessment roll.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 513.)
-------------------------------------------

9028.

“Land occupant” or “occupant of land” means a person in possession of land within a district whether as owner, lessee, tenant, or otherwise. A person legally entitled to possession of land is a land occupant as to that land whether in actual possession or not. A person in actual possession of land is a land occupant regardless of his right of possession.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 513.)
-------------------------------------------

9029.

“Voter” means an elector who is registered to vote pursuant to Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 2100) of Division 2 of the Elections Code, and residing within the district.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 923, Sec. 170.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

9030.

“Proxy” means a written authorization to sign a petition. Landowners may sign petitions under this division by proxy. The proxy of an individual landowner shall be acknowledged by him. The holder of a proxy of an individual landowner shall be an individual 18 years of age or over or a corporation, partnership, or other legal entity. The proxy of a corporation shall contain a statement by the secretary or manager of the corporation that the proxy was authorized by the corporation. A corporation owning land may sign a petition only by proxy.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 513.)
-------------------------------------------

9031.

“Person” includes person, association, or corporation.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 513.)
-------------------------------------------

9032.

“Assessment roll” means the entire assessment roll upon the basis of which real property is taxed for county purposes.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 513.)
-------------------------------------------

9033.

“Assessment records” includes the assessment roll and all maps and other records relating to the assessment, levy, and collection of taxes, whether in the custody of the assessor or not.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 513.)
-------------------------------------------

9034.

“Assessor” means the assessing officer of a county by whatever title he may be known.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 513.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Applicability [9041. - 9044.]

9041.

This Division 9 of the Public Resources Code, insofar as it is substantially the same as the Division 9 of that code repealed upon the enactment of this Division 9, shall be construed as a restatement and continuation of the existing law and not as a new enactment nor shall anything in this division impair the validity, the rights, or the obligations of any district formed prior to the effective date of this act.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 513.)
-------------------------------------------

9042.

No action or proceeding relating to or arising out of the Division 9 of the Public Resources Code repealed upon the enactment of this Division 9 commenced before the effective date of this Division 9, and no right accrued, pursuant to that repealed Division 9, is affected by the provisions of this Division 9, but any step thereafter taken in such action or proceeding shall conform to the provisions of this Division 9 insofar as is possible.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 513.)
-------------------------------------------

9043.

All persons who, at the time this Division 9 (commencing with Section 9001) goes into effect, are officers or employees of a soil conservation district operating under the Division 9 repealed upon the enactment of this Division 9 shall continue to be officers or employees, of a resource conservation district as though Division 9 had not been repealed.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 513.)
-------------------------------------------

9044.

The Imperial Irrigation District may exercise the powers of a resource conservation district under this division in any area within its boundaries in which there is no resource conservation district organized and operating.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 831, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 2. The Division of Resource Conservation [9051. - 9113.]



  ARTICLE 1. Organization [9051. - 9052.]

9051.

There is in the Department of Conservation the Division of Resource Conservation.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 513.)
-------------------------------------------

9052.

The Division of Resource Conservation is in charge of a chief, designated as Chief of the Division of Resource Conservation, who is appointed by the director with the advice and consent of the commission. The appointment shall be made pursuant to the State Civil Service Act from an eligible list prepared by the State Personnel Board from the results of an open examination.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 513.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Powers and Duties [9061. - 9071.]

9061.

The chief shall be responsible to the director for properly carrying out his functions under this division.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 513.)
-------------------------------------------

9062.

The chief shall assist in the formation, organization and operation of resource conservation districts.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 513.)
-------------------------------------------

9063.

He may advise with organized resource conservation districts as to plans and proposals relating to resource conservation activities, and, when such plans or proposals are presented to him, approve, disapprove, or suggest modifications of such plans or proposals.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 513.)
-------------------------------------------

9064.

He may, with the approval of the State Resource Conservation Commission, provide technical assistance to resource conservation districts to aid cooperators in carrying out conservation practices and to aid districts in developing plans for achieving their soil and water conservation objectives. These plans shall include but not be limited to watershed planning pursuant to the Watershed Protection and Flood Prevention Act (Public Law 566, Chapter 656, 83rd Congress, Second Session, as amended).

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 513.)
-------------------------------------------

9065.

He may cooperate with the United States, any resource conservation district, county, public district, or person in the furtherance of the purposes of this division, and to that end may receive and use contributions of funds or services or both for the investigating of, or planning works for, the control of runoff or the control or prevention of soil erosion.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 513.)
-------------------------------------------

9066.

Insofar as consistent with the duties, obligations and responsibilities of other public agencies, the chief may promote coordination of the activities of such agencies in furtherance of the control of runoff and the prevention and control of soil erosion.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 513.)
-------------------------------------------

9067.

The chief may employ such clerical, technical, or other assistants as he deems necessary.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 513.)
-------------------------------------------

9068.

The official headquarters of the chief shall be at Sacramento, California.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 513.)
-------------------------------------------

9069.

All persons, other than temporary employees, serving in the state civil service and engaged in the performance of a function transferred to the Division of Resource Conservation, Department of Conservation or engaged in the administration of a law, the administration of which is transferred to said division, shall remain in the state civil service and are hereby transferred to the division on the effective date of this act. The status, positions, and rights of such persons shall not be affected by their transfer and shall continue to be retained by them pursuant to the State Civil Service Act, except as to positions the duties of which are vested in a position that is exempt from civil service.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 513.)
-------------------------------------------

9070.

All money available, including money which becomes available after the effective date of this Division 9, for expenditure by any department, division, board, authority, commission, or officer or employee thereof, to be used in the administration of any function, the exercise of any right, or performance of any duty, which function, right or duty is transferred by this Division 9, shall be transferred to the department, commission, division, board, authority, or officer or employee thereof which is to administer the function, exercise the right, or perform the duty.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 513.)
-------------------------------------------

9071.

The Division of Resource Conservation shall succeed to and is hereby vested with all of the powers, duties, purposes, responsibilities, and jurisdiction in matters pertaining to resource conservation now or hereafter vested by law in the State Resource Conservation Commission, or any officer or employee thereof. The division shall have possession and control of all records, books, papers, and other property, real, personal and mixed, now or hereafter held for the benefit or use of the State Resource Conservation Commission, except that property heretofore purchased or acquired by the commission for the use of districts may be disposed of by the commission pursuant to Article 3 (commencing with Section 9081) of this chapter.

The Chief of the Division of Resource Conservation shall succeed to and is hereby vested with all the powers, duties, responsibilities and jurisdiction now or hereafter vested by law in the commission, except as to duties specifically vested in the commission by this code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 513.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Funds and Expenditures [9081. - 9084.]

9081.

The commission may receive contributions from the United States, public districts, resource conservation districts, public agencies, or persons and may use such contributions for the purposes of the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 513.)
-------------------------------------------

9082.

The commission is authorized on behalf of the state to accept grants from the United States for the control of runoff and floods, the prevention or control of soil erosion, and for water conservation and to administer such grants pursuant to the terms thereof.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 513.)
-------------------------------------------

9083.

All equipment and machinery made available to any resource conservation district pursuant to this Division 9 is subject to call for emergency use in fire, storm, flood or disaster by a federal or state agency, a county, city, or district of this state.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 513.)
-------------------------------------------

9084.

(a) Subject to the availability of funds and any limitations imposed by this division, the department may provide grants to resource conservation districts for the purpose of assisting the districts in carrying out any work that they are authorized to undertake, including, but not limited to, grants for watershed projects.

(b) (1) To qualify for a grant under subdivision (a), a resource conservation district shall do all of the following:

(A) Prepare an annual and a long-range work plan pursuant to Section 9413. The long-range work plan shall reflect input from local agencies and organizations regarding land use and resource conservation goals.

(B) Convene regular meetings in accordance with the open meeting requirements of Chapter 9 (commencing with Section 54950) of Part 1 of Division 2 of Title 5 of the Government Code and the requirements of this division.

(C) Secure sources of local support funding, which may include funding from in-kind contributions and services.

(2) A resource conservation district seeking a grant pursuant to this section shall submit to the department a grant proposal that includes, but is not limited to, all of the following information:

(A) A description of the work for which the grant is sought.

(B) An explanation of the public or private need for the work, including, but not limited to, any relevant
 information demonstrating the urgency of the project.

(C) An itemized summary of the projected cost of the work.

(D) An estimate of the amount of the projected costs of the work that will be covered by local support funding, including funding from in-kind contributions or services.

(3) (A) Except as provided in subparagraph (B), to qualify for a grant awarded pursuant to this section, a resource conservation district shall be required to provide at least a 25 percent local match of funding, of which 40 percent of that amount shall be provided in cash.

(B) The department may waive the local match of funding described in subparagraph (A) if the resource conservation district meets either of the following conditions:

(i) The resource conservation district serves either an under-resourced community, as defined in subdivision (g) of Section 71130, or a vulnerable community, as that term was adopted by the Integrated Climate Adaptation and Resiliency Program Technical Advisory Council at the council’s April 2, 2018, meeting and recorded in “Defining Vulnerable Communities in the Context of Climate Adaptation” by the Governor’s Office of Planning and Research in July 2018.

(ii) The resource conservation district receives no more than one hundred and fifty thousand dollars ($150,000) annually from taxes or assessments levied by the district or by a city, county, or city and county, which collects taxes or assessments on behalf of the district.

(4) A resource conservation district that receives a grant awarded under this section shall
 provide the department with an informal accounting summary that describes how the grant money was spent in accordance with the purposes and conditions of the grant.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 131, Sec. 171.   (AB 1754)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. The State Resource Conservation Commission [9101. - 9113.]

9101.

There is in the Department of Conservation the State Resource Conservation Commission. It shall consist of nine members who shall be appointed by the Governor, subject to the confirmation of the Senate, and shall be appointed for a term of four years.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 513.)
-------------------------------------------

9102.

The members of the commission to be appointed shall consist of the following:

(a) Five persons who are directors of resource conservation districts. In making such appointments, the Governor shall provide as nearly equal representation as possible from all portions of the state.

(b) Two persons from the general public.

(c) One person who has expertise in, and represents the interests of, wildlife conservation.

(d) One person who resides in, and represents the concerns of, the major urban areas of this state.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 513.)
-------------------------------------------

9103.

Within 30 days after his appointment the appointed member shall take and file his oath of office as member of the commission.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 513.)
-------------------------------------------

9104.

The members of the commission shall receive no compensation for their services as members, but each shall be allowed reasonable and necessary expenses incurred in attendance at meetings of the commission or when otherwise engaged in the work of the commission at its direction.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1981, Ch. 714, Sec. 366.)
-------------------------------------------

9105.

Five members of the commission shall constitute a quorum for any purpose, including organization.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 513.)
-------------------------------------------

9106.

The commission shall elect a chair from its number who shall serve as chair for one year and until the chair’s successor is elected.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 213, Sec. 15.   (AB 2768)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

9107.

The commission shall appoint a secretary. The secretary shall be a paid employee of the commission. The secretary shall be allowed his reasonable and necessary expenses incurred in the performance of his official duties as such secretary.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 513.)
-------------------------------------------

9108.

The commission shall cause to be studied and shall consider the whole problem of soil conservation within the state, and it may formulate, in cooperation with other state agencies, interested organizations, and citizens, a comprehensive resource conservation policy for the state.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 513.)
-------------------------------------------

9109.

The commission shall determine and advise policies for the guidance of the chief of the division in the performance and exercise of his duties and powers.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 513.)
-------------------------------------------

9110.

The commission shall aid and encourage, but not conduct, resource conservation activities.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 513.)
-------------------------------------------

9112.

The commission shall be responsible to the director for properly carrying out its functions under this division.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 513.)
-------------------------------------------

9113.

The commission shall report annually to the Governor on the resource conservation projects and improvements accomplished by or with the aid of the state, and the commission may from time to time prepare and publish reports on the needs of the state and the local subdivisions thereof for resource conservation programs, developments, facilities and activities.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 513.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 3. Resource Conservation Districts [9151. - 9491.]



  ARTICLE 1. Lands Included [9151. - 9155.]

9151.

A resource conservation district may be formed pursuant to this division to provide resource conservation services for the protection, conservation, restoration, or enhancement of natural resources. Resource conservation services may include the development and implementation of programs, projects, practices, and activities on public and private lands for all, but not limited to, the following purposes:

(a) The control of runoff, the prevention or control of soil erosion, the development and distribution of water, the implementation of erosion stabilization projects, and the improvement of land capabilities.

(b) Protecting people, communities, ecosystems, and public and private
 resources from devastating wildfire, flood, drought, and other human-made and natural disasters.

(c) Protecting, conserving, restoring, promoting, and improving the health, resilience, and adaptability to climate change of natural, working, and urban lands.

(d) Protecting and improving water quality, conserving water resources, and developing and distributing water.

(e) Planning, preparing for, and addressing sea level rise, storm surge, and other threats to the conservation and preservation of natural resources in coastal areas.

(f) Protecting, conserving, and restoring California’s biodiversity and soil biology, including, but not limited to, plants and wildlife.

(g) Controlling and
 eradicating invasive species, disease, and pests on natural, working, and urban lands.

(h) Restoring, enhancing, and providing stewardship of forest resources.

(i) Restoring and enhancing of agricultural lands to sustain California’s agricultural economy.

(j) Providing technical assistance to landowners and land managers in pursuit of all of the above.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 585, Sec. 6.   (AB 1902)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

9152.

The lands included in a district shall be those that further the purpose of this chapter, including, but not limited to, those purposes specified in Sections 9001 and 9151.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 585, Sec. 7.   (AB 1902)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

9153.

The lands included in any one district need not be contiguous. No lands may be included in more than one district.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 585, Sec. 8.   (AB 1902)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

9154.

The lands included in any one district may be situated in one or more counties.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 513.)
-------------------------------------------

9155.

The lands included in a district may be publicly owned or privately owned.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 513.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Initiation [9161. - 9168.]

9161.

(a) A new district may be formed pursuant to this chapter. 

(b) A proposal to form a district may be made by a petition of registered voters or by the adoption of a resolution of application.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 831, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

9162.

A proposal to form a new district may be made by petition which shall do all of the following:

(a) State that the proposal is made and request that proceedings be taken for the formation pursuant to this chapter. 

(b) Set forth a description of the boundaries of the territory to be included in the district. 

(c) Set forth the methods by which the district will be financed. 

(d) State the reasons for forming the district. 

(e) Propose a name for the district. 

(f) Designate not more than three persons as chief petitioners, setting forth their names and mailing addresses. 

(g) State whether the formation is consistent with the sphere of influence of any affected city or affected district. 

(h) Specify the number of members, whether five, seven, or nine, of the initial board of directors and the method of their selection, as provided by Article 4 (commencing with Section 9201).

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 831, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

9163.

(a) Before circulating any petition, the chief petitioners shall publish a notice of intention which shall include a written statement not to exceed 500 words in length, setting forth the reasons for forming the district. The notice shall be published pursuant to Section 6061 of the Government Code in one or more newspapers of general circulation within the territory proposed to be included in the district. If the territory proposed to be included in the district is located in more than one county, publication of the notice shall be made in at least one newspaper of general circulation in each of the counties. 

(b) The notice shall be signed by at least one, but not more than three, chief petitioners and shall be in substantially the following form:
 
“Notice of Intent to Circulate Petition 
Notice is hereby given of the intention to circulate a petition proposing to form the ____ (name of the district). The reasons for the proposal are: ____.‛

(c) Within five days after the date of publication, the chief petitioners shall file with the executive officer of the local agency formation commission of the principal county a copy of the notice together with an affidavit made by a representative of the newspaper in which the notice was published certifying to the fact of publication. 

(d) After the filing required pursuant to subdivision (c), the petition may be circulated for signatures.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 831, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

9164.

The petition shall be signed by not less than 10 percent of the registered voters residing in the area to be included in the district, as determined by the local agency formation commission pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 56375 of the Government Code. Sections 100 and 104 of the Elections Code shall govern the signing of the petition and its format.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 923, Sec. 171.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

9165.

A petition may consist of a single instrument or separate counterparts. The chief petitioner or petitioners shall file the petition, including all counterparts, with the executive officer of the local agency formation commission of the principal county within six months of the date on which the chief petitioner or petitioners filed the affidavit with the executive officer pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 9163.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 831, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

9166.

(a) Within 30 days after the date of filing a petition, the executive officer of the local agency formation commission shall cause the petition to be examined and shall prepare a certificate of sufficiency indicating whether the petition is signed by the requisite number of signers. 

(b) If the certificate of the executive officer shows the petition to be insufficient, the executive officer shall immediately give notice by certified mail of the insufficiency to the chief petitioners. That mailed notice shall state in what amount the petition is insufficient. Within 15 days after the date of the notice of insufficiency, the chief petitioners may file with the executive officer a supplemental petition bearing additional signatures. 

(c) Within 10 days after the date of filing a supplemental petition, the executive officer shall examine the supplemental petition and certify in writing the results of his or her examination. 

(d) The executive officer shall sign and date a certificate of sufficiency. That certificate shall also state the minimum signature requirements for a sufficient petition and show the results of the executive officer’s examination. The executive officer shall mail a copy of the certificate of sufficiency to the chief petitioners.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 831, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

9167.

(a) A proposal to form a new district may also be made by the adoption of a resolution of application by the legislative body of any county or city which contains territory proposed to be included in the district. Except for the provisions regarding signers and signatures, a resolution of application shall contain all of the matters specified for a petition in Section 9162. Before submitting a resolution of application, the legislative body shall conduct a public hearing on the resolution. 

(b) Notice of the hearing shall be published pursuant to Section 6061 of the Government Code in one or more newspapers of general circulation within the county or city. 

(c) At the hearing, the legislative body shall give any person an opportunity to present his or her views on the resolution. 

(d) The clerk of the legislative body shall file a certified copy of the resolution of application with the executive officer of the local agency formation commission of the principal county.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 831, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

9168.

Once the chief petitioners have filed a sufficient petition or a legislative body has filed a resolution of application, the local agency formation commission shall proceed pursuant to Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 56825) of Part 3 of Division 3 of Title 5 of the Government Code.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 831, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Election and Formation [9181. - 9190.]

9181.

(a) If the local agency formation commission approves the formation of a district, with or without amendment, wholly, partially, or conditionally, the executive officer shall mail a copy of the resolution of the commission’s determinations to the board of supervisors of each county within which territory of the proposed district lies. Within 35 days following the adoption of the commission’s resolution, the board of supervisors shall call and give notice of the election to be held in the proposed district. If the proposed district lies in more than one county, the board of supervisors shall call and give notice of the election to be held in the territory of the proposed district which lies in that county. 

(b) The election shall be held on the next regular or special election date not less than 113 nor more than 150 days after the date the board of supervisors calls and gives notice of the election. 

(c) Notice of the election shall be published pursuant to Section 6061 of the Government Code in a newspaper of general circulation circulated within the territory of the proposed district which lies in the county.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 831, Sec. 5.)
-------------------------------------------

9182.

(a) Notwithstanding Section 9181, if the board of supervisors of the principal county finds that the petition filed with the executive officer of the local agency formation commission pursuant to Section 9165 has been signed by not less than 80 percent of the registered voters residing within the area to be included within the district, the board may dispense with an election, adopt the resolution required pursuant to Section 9188, and designate the members of the board of directors pursuant to Article 4 (commencing with Section 9201). 

(b) Notwithstanding Section 9181, if the local agency formation commission approves a consolidation or reorganization pursuant to Section 56839 of the Government Code which results in the formation of a district without an election, the commission may designate the members of the board of directors from the membership of the board of directors of any of the consolidated or reorganized districts pursuant to subdivision (k) of Section 56844 of the Government Code. The terms of office of the directors shall be determined pursuant to Section 10505 of the Elections Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 923, Sec. 172.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

9183.

(a) Within five days after the district formation election has been called, the board of supervisors of each county within which territory of the proposed district lies shall transmit by registered mail a written notification of the election call to the executive officer of the local agency formation commission of the principal county. The written notice shall include the name and a description of the proposed district and may be in the form of a certified copy of the resolution adopted by the board of supervisors calling the district formation election. 

(b) The executive officer of the local agency formation commission shall submit an impartial analysis of the proposed district formation to the officials in charge of conducting the district formation election, pursuant to Section 56859 of the Government Code.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 831, Sec. 5.)
-------------------------------------------

9184.

(a) (1) The chief petitioners, the agency filing the resolution, or any member or members of the board of supervisors authorized by the board, any individual voter or bona fide association of citizens entitled to vote on the district formation proposition, or any combination of these voters and associations of citizens, may file with the elections official of the principal county a written argument for or a written argument against the proposed district formation.

(2) Arguments shall not exceed 300 words in length. Based on the time reasonably necessary to prepare and print the text of the proposition, analysis, arguments, and sample ballots and to permit the 10-day public examination period as provided in Section 9190 of the Elections Code for the particular election, the elections official of the principal county shall fix and determine a reasonable date prior to the election after which no arguments for or against the measure may be submitted for printing and distribution to the voters, pursuant to Section 9185. Notice of the date fixed shall be published by the elections official pursuant to Section 6061 of the Government Code. Arguments may be changed until and including the date fixed by the elections official.

(b) If more than one argument for or more than one argument against the proposed district formation is filed with the elections official within the time prescribed, the elections official shall select one of the arguments for printing and distribution to the voters. 

In selecting the arguments, the elections official shall give preference and priority in the order named to the arguments of the following:

(1) Chief petitioners, or the agency filing the resolution.

(2) The board of supervisors, or any member or members of the board authorized by the board.

(3) Individual voters, or bona fide associations of citizens or a combination of these voters and associations.

(c) When the elections official of the principal county has selected the arguments for and against the measure which will be printed and distributed to the voters, he or she shall send copies of the argument in favor of the measure to the authors of the argument against, and copies of the argument against to the authors of the argument in favor. The authors may prepare and submit rebuttal arguments not exceeding 250 words. The rebuttal arguments shall be filed with the elections official of the principal county not more than 10 days after the final date for filing direct arguments. Rebuttal arguments shall be printed in the same manner as the direct arguments. Each rebuttal argument shall immediately follow the direct argument which it seeks to rebut, and shall be titled “Rebuttal to Argument in Favor of Measure (or Proposition) ____” or “Rebuttal to Argument Against Measure (or Proposition) ____,” the blank spaces being filled in only with the letter or number, if any, designating the measure. Words used in the title shall not be counted when determining the length of any rebuttal argument.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 923, Sec. 173.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

9185.

(a) The elections officials in charge of conducting the election shall cause a ballot pamphlet concerning the district formation proposition to be voted on to be printed and mailed to each voter entitled to vote on the district formation question at least 10 days prior to the date of the election. The ballot pamphlet is “official matter” within the meaning of Section 13303 of the Elections Code. Section 9190 of the Elections Code shall apply to the materials required to be contained in the ballot pamphlet.

(b) The ballot pamphlet shall contain the following, in the order prescribed:

(1) The complete text of the proposition. 

(2) The impartial analysis of the proposition, submitted by the executive officer of the local agency formation commission.

(3) The argument for the proposed district formation. 

(4) The rebuttal to the argument in favor of the proposed district formation. 

(5) The argument against the proposed district formation. 

(6) The rebuttal to the argument against the proposed district formation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 923, Sec. 174.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

9186.

The notice of the election published pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 9181 shall contain all of the following:

(a) The date of the election. 

(b) The name of the proposed district. 

(c) The purposes for which the district is to be formed. 

(d) A statement that the first directors will be elected at that election or will be appointed, as the case may be, if the district is formed. 

(e) A description of the boundaries of the proposed district.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 831, Sec. 5.)
-------------------------------------------

9187.

(a) Except as otherwise provided in this division, the formation election and the election of members of the district board shall be held and conducted in accordance with the Uniform District Election Law (Part 4 (commencing with Section 10500) of Division 10 of the Elections Code).

(b) If less than a majority of the votes cast at the election is in favor of forming the district, the board of supervisors of the principal county shall declare the proceedings terminated.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 923, Sec. 175.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

9188.

If the majority of the votes cast at the election is in favor of forming the district, the board or boards of supervisors shall by resolution entered on its minutes declare the district duly organized under this division, giving the name of the district, and the purposes for which it is formed, and describing its boundaries. If the district lies in more than one county, the clerk of the board of supervisors of the principal county shall transmit a certified copy of the resolution to the clerk of the board of supervisors of each of the other counties in which the district lies.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 831, Sec. 5.)
-------------------------------------------

9189.

Immediately after adoption of a resolution pursuant to Section 9188, the clerk of the board of supervisors of the principal county shall transmit a certified copy of the resolution along with a remittance to cover the fees required by Section 54902.5 of the Government Code to the executive officer of the local agency formation commission. The executive officer shall complete the proceedings pursuant to Chapter 8 (commencing with Section 57200) of Part 4 of Division 3 of Title 5 of the Government Code.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 831, Sec. 5.)
-------------------------------------------

9190.

(a) No informality in any proceeding, including informality in the conduct of any election not substantially affecting adversely the legal rights of any person, shall invalidate the formation of any district. 

(b) The validity of the formation and organization of a district shall not be contested in any proceeding commenced more than 60 days after the date that the formation of the district is complete.